Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances
§ 35-7-1042.
Attempts and conspiracies.

Any person who attempts or conspires to commit any offense under this article within the state of Wyoming or who conspires to commit an act beyond the state of Wyoming which if done in this state would be an offense punishable under this article, shall be punished by imprisonment or fine or both which may not exceed the maximum punishment prescribed for the offense the commission of which was the object of the attempt or conspiracy.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.42.

Evidence sufficient.—

There was sufficient evidence to support defendant’s conviction for conspiracy to delivery a controlled substance such that a jury could reasonably infer from the facts before it that defendant had an individual connection with, and an appreciable ability to guide the destiny of the over 74 pounds of marijuana found in his compact car packaged in a form consistent with delivery, and producing a strong smell. Mitchell v. State, 2020 WY 142, 476 P.3d 224,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2020).

Subject matter jurisdiction over conspiracy. —

The trial court had jurisdiction over a prosecution for conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance, conspiracy to possess a controlled substance with intent to deliver, and conspiracy to possess a controlled substance where the defendant was stopped on a highway in Colorado while en route to deliver marijuana to a coperpetrator in Wyoming, notwithstanding that the conspiracies were not entered into in Wyoming and that the defendant committed no criminal acts in Wyoming, as there was an intent for the conspiracies to have an effect in Wyoming. Marquez v. State, 12 P.3d 711,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 2000).

Overt act is not essential element of crime of conspiracy.

Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981).

Possession and attempted possession with intent to deliver may be charged and tried together. —

It was proper for the indictment to charge possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver and attempted possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver, and it was also proper that both alleged violations be tried in one proceeding because they were of similar character and based on the same act or transaction or, at the very least, on two or more acts or transactions connected together or constituting part of a common scheme or plan. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976). See Rule 11 (a), W.R. Crim. P.

But conviction may only be on 1 count. —

Where the indictment charged defendant with possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver and attempted possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver, even though both counts could be brought under the same complaint (both counts could be tried at the same time, the same witnesses could testify in the proof of each charge insofar as their testimony was relevant, material and competent, or otherwise admissible, and the same evidence could be received to support each count), the defendant could not be convicted and sentenced to prison for more than one offense. There was but one transaction, one common scheme or plan, and, because one offense was merged with another, the convictions may not be stacked because the result would be to have twice placed the defendant in jeopardy in that he would have received multiple punishment for the same offense at one trial. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

This section and §

35-7-1031

(delivery) are directed at separate evils.

The delivery statute targets the delivery of drugs while the conspiracy statute is directed at prevention of partnerships in crime. Refusal to merge counts under the two statutes would therefore not involve a double jeopardy violation.
Dorador v. State, 768 P.2d 1049,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1989).

Interdependence element is not germane when evidence reveals only single two-party conspiracy,

and where only one conspiracy existed. Gilliam v. State, 890 P.2d 1104,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1995).

Fatal variance in information. —

Where defendant who lived in California sold drugs to Wyoming residents in California, to be sold in Wyoming, and was convicted of conspiracy with intent to deliver methamphetamine, but the information alleged that “the conspiratorial agreement occurred in Wyoming or defendant conspired to commit an act beyond the State of Wyoming,” the failure to include an element of the offense charged in the information, that a conspiracy occurred that was intended to have had an effect in Wyoming, was a fatal variance, which a detailed affidavit could not cure. Estrada-Sanchez v. State, 2003 WY 45, 66 P.3d 703,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2003).

“Prescription Fraud.” —

In a prosecution for conspiring and attempting to knowingly or intentionally acquire or obtain possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception, or subterfuge in violation of §

35-7-1033

and this section, use of the term “prescription fraud” to describe the substantive crime in instructions was not plain error. Thomas v. State, 958 P.2d 1059,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1998).

No standing to challenge search of vehicle. —

Where an informant told law enforcement officers that he had recently been in defendant's residence and purchased methamphetamine from defendant the night before, a deputy went to the home of defendant's fiancee's mother and observed a vehicle in the driveway matching the informant's description of the car driven; during a search of the vehicle, the deputy found drug paraphernalia and more than 20 ounces of marijuana. Defendant lacked standing to challenge the search of his fiancee's vehicle because he had no expectation of privacy in the vehicle; following the denial of his suppression motion, defendant entered a nolo contendere plea to conspiracy to distribute marijuana in violation of this section and possession of marijuana with intent to deliver.
Miller v. State, 2009 WY 125, 217 P.3d 793,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2009).

Evidence sufficient. —

There was sufficient evidence to uphold defendant's conviction for conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance where the defendant's co-conspirator testified that the co-conspirator and the defendant were engaged in an ongoing source-to-middleman for resale relationship that was mutually beneficial and that the co-conspirator had known the defendant for a number of years and had sold drugs to him repeatedly for his personal use and for resale. Wehr v. State, 841 P.2d 104,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence was sufficient to convict a defendant for conspiracy to distribute marijuana where the defendant admitted that he attended a meeting to discuss the distribution of marijuana and was present while sales of marijuana took place. Urrutia v. State, 924 P.2d 965,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1996).

Where numerous witnesses admitted to using and selling methamphetamine which they bought from defendant, defendant's conviction of conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-7-1042

and 35-7-1031(a)(i), was affirmed; there was sufficient evidence that defendant conspired with at least three people to deliver the drug. Adams v. State, 2003 WY 152, 79 P.3d 526,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2003).

Testimony of informant that defendant agreed to procure morphine for her, recording of discussions between informant and defendant throughout the course of their transaction, and defendant's statements to investigators that he was on his way to get morphine but changed his mind when he discovered he was being followed constituted sufficient evidence for jury to conclude defendant had an agreement with another person to violate the controlled substances act. Martinez v. State, 943 P.2d 1178,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant was properly convicted of conspiracy to possess methamphetamine with the intent to deliver. The agreement of the conspiracy, to regain possession of the half pound of commercial methamphetamine in an accomplice's bag so that the accomplice could sell the methamphetamine, could be reasonably inferred from the communication between the accomplices and defendant regarding what occurred vis a vis the informant. The defendant's intentional or active participation in the conspiracy could reasonably be inferred from the relationship between the defendant and accomplices, the communication between them regarding what occurred vis a vis the informant, the defendant's role in the ensuing discussions at the defendant's residence and in his vehicle, the particular statements attributed to the defendant during these discussions, and the defendant's conduct at his residence and upon leaving the residence. The requisite intent could reasonably be inferred from the foregoing and additional evidence concerning the accomplice's stated purpose in regaining possession of the methamphetamine, the testimony regarding the significance of the quantity of the methamphetamine involved, and the testimony regarding the manner in which the methamphetamine was packaged. Ekholm v. State, 2004 WY 159, 102 P.3d 201,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence sufficient to support conspiracy conviction. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a conviction for conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance where defendant sold methamphetamine out of an accomplice's motel room with her knowledge, the accomplice negotiated for the informant to buy methamphetamine from defendant at least partially with defendant's knowledge, and defendant delivered to the informant the quantity of methamphetamine agreed to between the informant and the accomplice. In addition, the informant testified that it was defendant who sold her the drugs. Leyo v. State, 2005 WY 92, 116 P.3d 1113,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2005).

Corroborating evidence not necessary. —

Where numerous witnesses admitted at trial to using and selling methamphetamine which they bought from defendant, defendant's conviction of conspiracy to deliver a controlled substance, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-7-1042

and 35-7-1031(a)(i), was affirmed, and no corroborating evidence was required; evidence corroborating the co-conspirator's statement is necessary when out-of-court statements of a co-conspirator are utilized but when in-court statements of a co-conspirator are involved, independent evidence of the conspiracy is not required. Adams v. State, 2003 WY 152, 79 P.3d 526,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2003).

Conviction requires actual agreement. —

The defendant's conviction for conspiracy to deliver marijuana and cocaine was reversed because there was never an actual agreement to deliver these drugs. Where the evidence showed that there was no drug distribution ring to speak of, that there was no one in the business of selling narcotics except the state's informant and that the defendant merely gave or paid money to buy drugs for himself, no agreement was ever reached for conspiracy purposes. Mondello v. State, 843 P.2d 1152,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1992).

Government agent is not a co-conspirator. —

A defendant cannot be found guilty of conspiring to deliver a controlled substance when the only other member of the alleged conspiracy is a government agent. Palato v. State, 988 P.2d 512,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1999).

Evidence showing that defendant sold drugs to witnesses in California, hid the drugs somewhere in their vehicle, then followed them to Wyoming to remove the drugs, that the witnesses were provided the drugs on the condition that the witnesses would be paid proceeds from selling them, and that the witnesses later traveled back to California with thousands of dollars paid to defendant was sufficient to support the jury's verdict that there was a conspiracy that intended the drugs would be distributed in Wyoming. Estrada-Sanchez v. State, 2003 WY 45, 66 P.3d 703,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2003).

Reasonable suspicion and probable cause. —

Motion to suppress was properly denied because a search did not violate the defendants'
rights under the U.S. Const. amend. IV or under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4; a dog sniff was justified by a reasonably articulable suspicion of illegal activity, and the dog's alert provided the officer with probable cause to search the trunk.
Yoeuth v. State, 2009 WY 61, 206 P.3d 1278,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Smallfoot v. State, 2012 WY 39, 272 P.3d 314,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Mar. 16, 2012).

Cited

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Wells v. State, 846 P.2d 589,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1992); Capshaw v. State, 11 P.3d 905,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2000); Peden v. State, 2006 WY 26, 129 P.3d 869,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006); Lawrence v. State, 2007 WY 183, 171 P.3d 517,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Nov. 15, 2007); Garvin v. State, 2007 WY 190, 172 P.3d 725,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Dec. 6, 2007); Klomliam v. State, 2014 WY 1, 315 P.3d 665,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 1

, 2014 WL 28838 (Jan 3, 2014); Russell v. State, 2013 WY 137, 312 P.3d 76,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 143

, 2013 WL 5859618 (Oct 31, 2013); Russell v. State, 2013 WY 137, 312 P.3d 76,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 143

, 2013 WL 5859618 (Oct 31, 2013); Cardenas v. State, 2014 WY 92,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 1

02, 2014 WL 3586509 (Jul 22, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Proper venue in prosecution under 21 USC § 846 for attempt or conspiracy to violate Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970, 74 ALR Fed 669.

Federal criminal liability of narcotics conspirator for different substantive crime of other conspirator, 77 ALR Fed 661.

Burden of proof and presumptions in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law, 104 ALR5th 229.

§ 35-7-1043.
Immunity from prosecution.

All duly authorized peace officers including any special agents or other personnel appointed by the commissioner, and probation and parole agents as defined in W.S.

7-13-401

, while investigating violations of this act in performance of their official duties, shall be immune from prosecution under this act. Any person working under the immediate direction, supervision or instruction of a duly authorized peace officer, special agent or other person appointed by the commissioner, may be granted immunity from prosecution under this act by the commissioner. In addition to the foregoing persons, such immunity may also be granted to any person whose testimony is necessary to secure a conviction under this act with the consent of district judge in the district wherein prosecution is to take place. Any person granted immunity under this section shall not be excused from testifying or producing evidence on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to penalty or forfeiture. Any person who except for the provisions of this act, would have been privileged to withhold the testimony given or the evidence produced by him shall not be prosecuted, subjected to any penalty, forfeiture, for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which, by reason of said immunity, he gave testimony and produced evidence; and no such testimony given or evidence produced shall be received against him in any criminal proceeding. Provided, no person given immunity under this section shall be exempt from prosecution for perjury or contempt committed while giving testimony or producing evidence under compulsion as provided in this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.43; 2011, ch. 30, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “and probation and parole agents as defined in W.S.

7-13-401

” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Quoted

in

Jaramillo v. State, 802 P.2d 872,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Criminal Procedure — Witness Immunity — The Story of a County Attorney Who Said, ‘I Think I Can, I Think I Can,’ and the Brave Little Conscience that Couldn't be
Shocked. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Competency of drug addict or user to identify suspect material as narcotic or controlled substance, 95 ALR3d 972.

Actions by state official involving defendant as constituting “outrageous” conduct violating due process guaranties, 18 ALR5th 1.

§ 35-7-1044.
Peyote delivered, possessed or used for religious sacramental purposes.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit the delivery, possession or use of peyote in natural form, when delivered, possessed or used for bona fide religious sacramental purposes by members of the Native American Church of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.44.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of Religious Freedom Restoration Act (42 USCS § 2000bb et seq.), 135 ALR Fed 121.

Article VI

§ 35-7-1045.
Duties and powers of law enforcement officers; search warrants.

Notwithstanding the powers conferred upon the attorney general by this act all law enforcement officers within this state shall have the responsibility for the enforcement of this act.

Any special agent designated by the attorney general and any law enforcement officer engaged in the enforcement of this act may:

Carry firearms in the performance of his official duties;

Serve search warrants, arrest warrants, administrative inspection warrants, subpoenas, and summonses issued under the authority of this state;

Make arrests without warrant for any offense under this act committed in his presence, or if he has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed, or is committing a violation of this act;

Make seizures of property pursuant to this act; and

Perform such other law enforcement duties as the commissioner may designate.

All prosecutions originating under this act shall be the duty and obligation of the district attorney for the county in which the offense occurred.

A search warrant relating to offenses involving controlled substances may be served at any time of the day or night if the judge or district court commissioner issuing the warrant is satisfied that there is probable cause to believe that grounds exist for the warrant and for its service at such time.

Any officer authorized to execute a search warrant relating to offenses involving controlled substances the penalty for which is imprisonment for more than one (1) year may, without notice of his authority and purpose, break open an outer or inner door or window of a building, or any part of the building, or anything therein, only if a district judge or district court commissioner issuing the warrant: (i) is satisfied that there is probable cause to believe that (A) the property sought may and, if such notice is given, will be easily and quickly destroyed or disposed of, or (B) the giving of such notice will immediately endanger the life or safety of the executing officer or another person; and (ii) has included in the warrant a direction that the officer executing it shall not be required to give such notice. Any officer acting under such warrant, shall, as soon as practicable after entering the premises, identify himself and give the reason and authority for his entrance upon the premises.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.45; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., Ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

For procedure relating to search warrants, see Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Standard of review. —

The standard of review in considering whether a no-knock search warrant was properly issued is similar to the court's review of whether there was probable cause to issue a search warrant; just as when reviewing probable cause, the court shall afford the issuing judge's determination great deference upon appeal and the determination must be reviewed under a totality of the circumstances test. Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994).

Test to be applied. —

After concluding probable cause exists to issue a search warrant, the issuing judge should separately consider whether exigent circumstances justify execution of a search warrant without the requirement of first knocking and announcing the purpose for the police presence; the appropriate test is whether the police information obtained in advance shows reasonable cause to believe exigent circumstances as set forth in the statute exist which would endanger the successful execution of the warrant. Lobatos v. State, 875 P.2d 716,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1994).

Justice's of peace authority to issue search warrant not statutorily limited. —

Inasmuch as a justice of the peace is authorized by Rule 41, W.R. Cr. P., to issue a search warrant in a controlled substance case, such authority is not limited by subsection (d), which only places a condition on the service of the warrant at night. Ehrenborg v. State, 639 P.2d 886,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1982).

Absent prejudice, no suppression of illegally-seized evidence. —

Although neither the affidavit nor warrant provided the requisite reasonable cause for a search warrant to be served at night, suppression of evidence seized under the warrant was not required, absent any evidence that the defendants were prejudiced by the nighttime service. United States v. Shelton, 742 F. Supp. 1491, 1990 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10035 (D. Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Mason v. United States, 719 F.2d 1485, 1983 U.S. App. LEXIS 15900 (10th Cir. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of evidence discovered in warrantless search of rental property authorized by lessor of such property — state cases, 2 ALR4th 1173; 61 ALR5th 1.

Propriety of execution of search warrant at nighttime, 41 ALR5th 171.

§ 35-7-1046.
Administrative inspection warrants.

Issuance and execution of administrative inspection warrants for controlled premises as defined in this section shall be as follows:

Any district court judge or district court commissioner upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause, may issue warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative inspections authorized by this act or rules hereunder, and seizures of property appropriate to such inspections. For purposes of the issuance of administrative inspection warrants, probable cause exists upon showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this act, as it relates to the regulation of the legitimate traffic in controlled substances, sufficient to justify administrative inspection of the area, premises, building or conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the warrant;

A warrant shall issue only upon an affidavit of a designated officer or employee of the board or of the commissioner having knowledge of the facts alleged, sworn to before the district judge or district court commissioner establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. If the district judge or district court commissioner is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, he shall issue a warrant identifying the area, premises, building, or conveyance to be inspected, the purpose of the inspection, and, if appropriate, the type of property to be inspected, if any. The warrant shall:

State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support thereof;

Be directed to a person authorized by W.S.

35-7-1045

to execute it;

Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premises, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified and, if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified;

Identify the item or types of property to be seized, if any;

Direct that it be served during normal business hours and designate the judge to whom it shall be returned.

A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and returned within ten (10) days of its date unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. If property is seized pursuant to a warrant, a copy shall be given to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken, together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any property taken. The inventory shall be made in the presence of the person executing the warrant and of the person from whose possession or premises the property was taken, if present or in the presence of at least one (1) credible person other than the person executing the warrant. A copy of the inventory shall be delivered to the person from whom or from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the warrant;

The judge or district court commissioner who has issued a warrant shall attach thereto a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection therewith and file them with the clerk of the district court for the judicial district in which the inspection was made.

The board may make administrative inspections of controlled premises in accordance with the following provisions:

For purposes of this section only, “controlled premises” means:

Places where persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this act are required to keep records; and

Places including factories, warehouses, establishments, and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this act other than an ultimate user are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell, deliver, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance.

When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section an officer or employee designated by the board or commissioner, upon presenting the warrant and appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, may enter controlled premises for the purpose of conducting an administrative inspection;

When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant, an officer or employee designated by the board or commissioner may:

Inspect and copy records required by this act to be kept;

Inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, controlled premises and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished material, containers, and labeling found therein, and except as provided in paragraph (b)(v) of this section, all other things therein, including records, files, papers, processes, controls, and facilities bearing on violation of this act; and

Inventory any stock of any controlled substance therein and obtain samples thereof.

This section does not prevent the inspection without a warrant of books and records pursuant to an administrative subpoena issued in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] and the rules promulgated thereunder, nor does it prevent entries and administrative inspections, including seizures of property, without a warrant:

If the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents;

In situations presenting imminent danger to health or safety where a warrant is not constitutionally required;

In situations involving inspection of conveyances if there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impracticable to obtain a warrant;

In any other exceptional or emergency circumstance where time or opportunity to apply for a warrant is lacking and a warrant is not constitutionally required; or

In all other situations in which a warrant is not constitutionally required.

An inspection authorized by this section shall not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data, unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 46; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.46; Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (b)(iv)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-7-1047.
Injunctions against violations.

The district courts of this state have jurisdiction to restrain or enjoin violations of this act.

The defendant may demand trial by jury for an alleged violation of an injunction or restraining order under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 47; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.47.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1048.
Cooperation with federal and other state agencies.

The state board of pharmacy and the commissioner shall cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging their responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances. To this end, they may:

Arrange for the exchange of information among governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances;

Coordinate and cooperate in training programs concerning controlled substance law enforcement at local and state levels;

Cooperate with the bureau by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including records of drug dependent persons and other controlled substance law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes. Unless otherwise provided by law, they shall not furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under privileged communication acts; and

Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled substances may be extracted.

Results, information, and evidence received from the bureau relating to the regulatory functions of this act, including results of inspections conducted by it may be relied and acted upon by the board or commissioner in the exercise of the regulatory functions under this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 48; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.48; 2003, ch. 176, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to confidentiality and privilege of reports, etc., of hospital medical staff committees, see §

35-2-609

.

As to privileged communications and acts generally, see §

1-12-101

.

As to communications with licensed psychologist being privileged, see §

33-27-123

.

For confidentiality of records, etc., under the Medical Assistance and Services Act, see §

42-4-112

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).